Massachusetts, session 194th, H2453.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 13 of Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by adding after the first paragraph, the following paragraph:- 
The department shall not classify barber shops and beauty salons together so as to require 
the same system sewage flow design criteria for on-site subsurface sewage disposal.  Until such 
time as the department classifies barber shops and beauty salons as two distinct types of 
commercial uses, businesses that operate exclusively as barber shops pursuant to Section 87T of 
Chapter 112, shall be exempt from any rule related to the system sewage flow design criteria for 
beauty salons; provided further, that any qualified barber shop as described herein shall apply to 
the department for a unique determination of system sewage design flow.